Russian-English Bilingual.aff
SFX 161 Y 8
SFX 161 e ingly [^eioy]e
SFX 161 0 ingly [eoy]e
SFX 161 ie yingly ie
SFX 161 0 kingly [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 161 0 lingly [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 161 0 ingly [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 161 0 ingly [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 161 0 ingly [^ecl]

SFX 162 Y 9
SFX 162 e ably [^acegilou]e
SFX 162 0 ably [acegilou]e
SFX 162 0 kably [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 162 0 lably [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 162 0 ably [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 162 0 ably [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 162 y iably [^aeiou]y
SFX 162 0 ably [aeiou]y
SFX 162 0 ably [^cely]

SFX 163 Y 20
SFX 163 0 sman [bdknmt]
SFX 163 0 sman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 man [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 man [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 man [^bdeknmt]
SFX 163 0 smen [bdknmt]
SFX 163 0 smen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 men [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 men [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 men [^bdeknmt]
SFX 163 0 sman's [bdknmt]
SFX 163 0 sman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 man's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 man's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 man's [^bdeknmt]
SFX 163 0 smen's [bdknmt]
SFX 163 0 smen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 men's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 men's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 163 0 men's [^bdeknmt]

SFX 164 Y 28
SFX 164 0 tion a
SFX 164 e tion ce
SFX 164 ke cation ke
SFX 164 e ation [iou]te
SFX 164 e ion [^iou]te
SFX 164 e ation [^ckt]e
SFX 164 el ulsion el
SFX 164 0 lation [aiou]l
SFX 164 0 ation [^aeiou]l
SFX 164 er ration er
SFX 164 0 ation [^e]r
SFX 164 y ation py
SFX 164 y ication [^p]y
SFX 164 0 ation [^aelry]
SFX 164 0 tions a
SFX 164 e tions ce
SFX 164 ke cations ke
SFX 164 e ations [iou]te
SFX 164 e ions [^iou]te
SFX 164 e ations [^ckt]e
SFX 164 el ulsions el
SFX 164 0 lations [aiou]l
SFX 164 0 ations [^aeiou]l
SFX 164 er rations er
SFX 164 0 ations [^e]r
SFX 164 y ations py
SFX 164 y ications [^p]y
SFX 164 0 ations [^aelry]

SFX 165 Y 12
SFX 165 0 lly a
SFX 165 e ally [^bcgv]e
SFX 165 e ially [bcgv]e
SFX 165 0 ially [bcrx]
SFX 165 um ally um
SFX 165 0 ally [^u]m
SFX 165 y ally ty
SFX 165 y ially [^t]y
SFX 165 0 ually [px]t
SFX 165 0 tally [iu]t
SFX 165 0 ally [^ipux]t
SFX 165 0 ally [^aebcrtxmy]

SFX 166 Y 5
SFX 166 y iless [^aeiou]y
SFX 166 0 less [aeiou]y
SFX 166 0 ess ll
SFX 166 0 less [^l]l
SFX 166 0 less [^ly]

SFX 167 Y 45
SFX 167 0 tisation a
SFX 167 e isation [^l]e
SFX 167 le ilisation [^aeiou]le
SFX 167 e isation [aeiou]le
SFX 167 um isation um
SFX 167 0 isation [^u]m
SFX 167 s sation is
SFX 167 0 isation [^i]s
SFX 167 y isation [^aeiou]y
SFX 167 0 isation [aeiou]y
SFX 167 0 isation [^aemsy]
SFX 167 0 tisations a
SFX 167 e isations [^l]e
SFX 167 le ilisations [^aeiou]le
SFX 167 e isations [aeiou]le
SFX 167 um isations um
SFX 167 0 isations [^u]m
SFX 167 s sations is
SFX 167 0 isations [^i]s
SFX 167 y isations [^aeiou]y
SFX 167 0 isations [aeiou]y
SFX 167 0 isations [^aemsy]
SFX 167 SFX - Y 22
SFX 167 SFX - 0 tization a
SFX 167 SFX - e ization [^l]e
SFX 167 SFX - le ilization [^aeiou]le
SFX 167 SFX - e ization [aeiou]le
SFX 167 SFX - um ization um
SFX 167 SFX - 0 ization [^u]m
SFX 167 SFX - s zation is
SFX 167 SFX - 0 ization [^i]s
SFX 167 SFX - y ization [^aeiou]y
SFX 167 SFX - 0 ization [aeiou]y
SFX 167 SFX - 0 ization [^aemsy]
SFX 167 SFX - 0 tizations a
SFX 167 SFX - e izations [^l]e
SFX 167 SFX - le ilizations [^aeiou]le
SFX 167 SFX - e izations [aeiou]le
SFX 167 SFX - um izations um
SFX 167 SFX - 0 izations [^u]m
SFX 167 SFX - s zations is
SFX 167 SFX - 0 izations [^i]s
SFX 167 SFX - y izations [^aeiou]y
SFX 167 SFX - 0 izations [aeiou]y
SFX 167 SFX - 0 izations [^aemsy]

SFX 168 Y 24
SFX 168 0 r e
SFX 168 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 168 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 168 y ier [^aeiou]y
SFX 168 0 er [aeiou]y
SFX 168 0 er [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 168 0 er [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 168 0 er [^ecly]
SFX 168 0 rs e
SFX 168 0 lers [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 168 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 168 y iers [^aeiou]y
SFX 168 0 ers [aeiou]y
SFX 168 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 168 0 ers [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 168 0 ers [^ecly]
SFX 168 0 r's e
SFX 168 0 ler's [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 168 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 168 y ier's [^aeiou]y
SFX 168 0 er's [aeiou]y
SFX 168 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 168 0 er's [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 168 0 er's [^ecly]

SFX 169 Y 33
SFX 169 0 tiser a
SFX 169 e iser [^l]e
SFX 169 le iliser [^aeiou]le
SFX 169 e iser [aeiou]le
SFX 169 um iser um
SFX 169 0 iser [^u]m
SFX 169 s ser is
SFX 169 0 iser [^i]s
SFX 169 y iser [^aeiou]y
SFX 169 0 iser [aeiou]y
SFX 169 0 iser [^aemsy]
SFX 169 0 tisers a
SFX 169 e isers [^l]e
SFX 169 le ilisers [^aeiou]le
SFX 169 e isers [aeiou]le
SFX 169 um isers um
SFX 169 0 isers [^u]m
SFX 169 s sers is
SFX 169 0 isers [^i]s
SFX 169 y isers [^aeiou]y
SFX 169 0 isers [aeiou]y
SFX 169 0 isers [^aemsy]
SFX 169 0 tiser's a
SFX 169 e iser's [^l]e
SFX 169 le iliser's [^aeiou]le
SFX 169 e iser's [aeiou]le
SFX 169 um iser's um
SFX 169 0 iser's [^u]m
SFX 169 s ser's is
SFX 169 0 iser's [^i]s
SFX 169 y iser's [^aeiou]y
SFX 169 0 iser's [aeiou]y
SFX 169 0 iser's [^aemsy]

SFX 170 Y 45
SFX 170 0 tisable a
SFX 170 e isable [^l]e
SFX 170 le ilisable [^aeiou]le
SFX 170 e isable [aeiou]le
SFX 170 um isable um
SFX 170 0 isable [^u]m
SFX 170 s sable is
SFX 170 0 isable [^i]s
SFX 170 y isable [^aeiou]y
SFX 170 0 isable [aeiou]y
SFX 170 0 isable [^aemsy]
SFX 170 0 tisability a
SFX 170 e isability [^l]e
SFX 170 le ilisability [^aeiou]le
SFX 170 e isability [aeiou]le
SFX 170 um isability um
SFX 170 0 isability [^u]m
SFX 170 s sability is
SFX 170 0 isability [^i]s
SFX 170 y isability [^aeiou]y
SFX 170 0 isability [aeiou]y
SFX 170 0 isability [^aemsy]
SFX 170 SFX + Y 22
SFX 170 SFX + 0 tizable a
SFX 170 SFX + e izable [^l]e
SFX 170 SFX + le ilizable [^aeiou]le
SFX 170 SFX + e izable [aeiou]le
SFX 170 SFX + um izable um
SFX 170 SFX + 0 izable [^u]m
SFX 170 SFX + s zable is
SFX 170 SFX + 0 izable [^i]s
SFX 170 SFX + y izable [^aeiou]y
SFX 170 SFX + 0 izable [aeiou]y
SFX 170 SFX + 0 izable [^aemsy]
SFX 170 SFX + 0 tizability a
SFX 170 SFX + e izability [^l]e
SFX 170 SFX + le ilizability [^aeiou]le
SFX 170 SFX + e izability [aeiou]le
SFX 170 SFX + um izability um
SFX 170 SFX + 0 izability [^u]m
SFX 170 SFX + s zability is
SFX 170 SFX + 0 izability [^i]s
SFX 170 SFX + y izability [^aeiou]y
SFX 170 SFX + 0 izability [aeiou]y
SFX 170 SFX + 0 izability [^aemsy]

SFX 171 Y 15
SFX 171 0 tiveness [aio]
SFX 171 b ptiveness b
SFX 171 d siveness d
SFX 171 be ptiveness be
SFX 171 e tiveness ce
SFX 171 de siveness de
SFX 171 ke cativeness ke
SFX 171 e ptiveness me
SFX 171 e iveness [st]e
SFX 171 e ativeness [^bcdkmst]e
SFX 171 0 lativeness [aeiou]l
SFX 171 0 ativeness [^aeiou]l
SFX 171 0 iveness [st]
SFX 171 y icativeness y
SFX 171 0 ativeness [^abdeilosty]

SFX 172 Y 15
SFX 172 0 tively [aio]
SFX 172 b ptively b
SFX 172 d sively d
SFX 172 be ptively be
SFX 172 e tively ce
SFX 172 de sively de
SFX 172 ke catively ke
SFX 172 e ptively me
SFX 172 e ively [st]e
SFX 172 e atively [^bcdkmst]e
SFX 172 0 latively [aeiou]l
SFX 172 0 atively [^aeiou]l
SFX 172 0 ively [st]
SFX 172 y icatively y
SFX 172 0 atively [^abdeilosty]

SFX 173 Y 9
SFX 173 e ical e
SFX 173 er rical er
SFX 173 0 ical [^e]r
SFX 173 0 atical [aeiou]m
SFX 173 0 ical [^aeiou]m
SFX 173 0 tical ma
SFX 173 a ical [^m]a
SFX 173 y ical y
SFX 173 0 ical [^aemry]

SFX 174 Y 40
SFX 174 b ptional b
SFX 174 d sional d
SFX 174 be ptional be
SFX 174 e tional ce
SFX 174 ke cational ke
SFX 174 de sional de
SFX 174 e ional [^o]se
SFX 174 e itional ose
SFX 174 e ional te
SFX 174 e ational [^bcdkst]e
SFX 174 el ulsional el
SFX 174 0 lational [aiou]l
SFX 174 0 ational [^aeiou]l
SFX 174 er rational er
SFX 174 0 ational [^e]r
SFX 174 0 ional [sx]
SFX 174 0 ional [^n]t
SFX 174 0 ational nt
SFX 174 y icational y
SFX 174 0 ational [^bdelrstxy]
SFX 174 b ptionally b
SFX 174 d sionally d
SFX 174 be ptionally be
SFX 174 e tionally ce
SFX 174 ke cationally ke
SFX 174 de sionally de
SFX 174 e ionally [^o]se
SFX 174 e itionally ose
SFX 174 e ionally te
SFX 174 e ationally [^bcdkst]e
SFX 174 el ulsionally el
SFX 174 0 lationally [aiou]l
SFX 174 0 ationally [^aeiou]l
SFX 174 er rationally er
SFX 174 0 ationally [^e]r
SFX 174 0 ionally [sx]
SFX 174 0 ionally [^n]t
SFX 174 0 ationally nt
SFX 174 y icationally y
SFX 174 0 ationally [^bdelrstxy]

SFX 175 Y 15
SFX 175 e ory te
SFX 175 e atory [mr]e
SFX 175 e ary se
SFX 175 0 ry [^mrst]e
SFX 175 0 ory [^aeous]t
SFX 175 0 ry [aeous]t
SFX 175 0 ery h
SFX 175 0 atory [^i]m
SFX 175 im matory im
SFX 175 0 ory s
SFX 175 0 ary ion
SFX 175 0 ry [^i]on
SFX 175 0 nery [aiu]n
SFX 175 0 ry [^aiou]n
SFX 175 0 ry [^ehmstn]

SFX 176 Y 24
SFX 176 e ily [^aeiouy]e
SFX 176 0 ily [aeiouy]e
SFX 176 0 ily [aiou]y
SFX 176 ey ily ey
SFX 176 y ily [^aeiou]y
SFX 176 0 bily [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 176 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 176 0 dily [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 176 0 fily [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 176 0 gily [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 176 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 176 0 lily [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 176 0 mily [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 176 0 nily [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX 176 0 pily [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 176 0 rily [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX 176 0 sily [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 176 0 tily [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX 176 0 vily [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 176 0 zily [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 176 0 ily [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 176 0 ily [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX 176 0 ily [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX 176 0 ily [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
